tests/tenses.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../sah.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../sah.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "Future affirmative бар":
    бар<v><iv><fut><p1><sg> : барыаҕым
    бар<v><iv><fut><p2><sg> : барыаҕыҥ
    бар<v><iv><fut><p3><sg> : барыаҕа
    бар<v><iv><fut><p1><pl> : барыахпыт
    бар<v><iv><fut><p2><pl> : барыаххыт
    бар<v><iv><fut><p3><pl> : барыахтара

  "Future negative бар":
    бар<v><iv><neg><fut><p1><sg> : барыам суоҕа
    бар<v><iv><neg><fut><p2><sg> : барыаҥ суоҕа
    бар<v><iv><neg><fut><p3><sg> : барыа суоҕа
    бар<v><iv><neg><fut><p1><pl> : барыахпыт суоҕа
    бар<v><iv><neg><fut><p2><pl> : барыаххыт суоҕа
    бар<v><iv><neg><fut><p3><pl> : барыахтара суоҕа
